Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-1555
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Protection of Seniors from Insurance Exploitation Act, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations related to:

(1) The form and manner of the notifications under section 44-1551; and

(2) The specific content and methods of the training required under section 44-1553.

Laws 2026, LB967, § 25.
July 18, 2026